Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256S.205, subdivision 7, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06784 256S.205 CUSTOMIZED LIVING SERVICES; DISPROPORTIONATE SHARE RATE ADJUSTMENTS. Subd. 7. Expiration. This section expires May 31, 2028.